Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

27-60-100.3. Definitions.

As used in this article 60, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health" refers to an individual's mental and emotional well-being and actions that affect an individual's overall wellness. Behavioral health problems and disorders include substance use disorders, serious psychological distress, suicide, and other mental health disorders. Problems ranging from unhealthy stress or subclinical conditions to diagnosable and treatable diseases are included in the term "behavioral health". The term "behavioral health" is also used to describe service systems that encompass prevention and promotion of emotional health, prevention and treatment services for mental health and substance use disorders, and recovery support.

(1.1) "Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

(1.3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the behavioral health administration.

(1.5) "Criminal justice diversion program" means a program created pursuant to section 27-60-106.5 or programs operated by cities or counties that connect law enforcement officers with behavioral health providers to assist individuals in need of behavioral health interventions or to divert individuals from the criminal justice system.

"Crisis intervention services" means the array of behavioral health crisis services that are funded by public or private sources and exist to serve individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis.

"Crisis response system" means the behavioral health crisis response system developed and implemented pursuant to this article 60.

"Crisis response system contractor" means an entity that has been awarded a contract to provide one or more crisis intervention services pursuant to section 27-60-103.

(4.7) Repealed.

"State board" means the state board of human services created and authorized pursuant to section 26-1-107.

"State department" means the state department of human services created pursuant to section 26-1-105.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1335, § 226, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

(4.7) added, (SB 18-250), ch. 403, p. 2376, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2020:

(1.5) added, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1426, § 11, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(1.1) and (1.3) added and (4.7) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1519, § 87, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-60-101. Behavioral health crisis response system - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

There are people in Colorado communities who are experiencing behavioral health crises and need professional behavioral health crisis care or urgent psychiatric care from skilled mental health clinicians and medical professionals who excel at providing compassionate behavioral health crisis intervention and stabilization;

A behavioral health crisis can happen any hour of the day and any day of the week;

Persons in a behavioral health crisis frequently come in contact with community first responders who are often unable to provide necessary behavioral health interventions or who must transport these persons in a behavioral health crisis to emergency rooms for services, or, in cases where a crime is alleged, to jail;

Colorado ranks fiftieth in the nation in the number of inpatient psychiatric beds;

Fewer than one-half of the persons who are in a behavioral health crisis and are taken to an emergency room are admitted for inpatient hospitalization, meaning that thousands of people each year return to community streets with little, if any, crisis intervention or treatment for behavioral health disorders; and

Significant time and resources are required of community first responders in addressing persons in a behavioral health crisis and, in many cases, this community response is neither timely nor safe for the person in crisis nor cost-efficient for the state.

The general assembly therefore finds that a coordinated behavioral health crisis response system:

Serves as a comprehensive and preferred response to behavioral health emergencies throughout Colorado by providing for early intervention and effective treatment of individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis;

(I.5) As the appropriate and preferred response to behavioral health crises, eliminates the use of the criminal justice system to hold individuals who are experiencing a mental health crisis and enhances the ability of mental health providers and hospitals to serve individuals who are experiencing a mental health crisis;

Provides an appropriate first line of response to individuals in need of an emergency seventy-two-hour mental health hold and utilizes first responders and information technology systems to integrate available behavioral health crisis responses;

Should be available in all Colorado communities;

Includes community-based, behavioral health crisis centers where individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis may be stabilized and receive short-term treatment, as clinically appropriate;

Decriminalizes mental health disorders by leading the development of a partnership-supported network of crisis services; and

Establishes a statewide framework that creates, strengthens, and enhances community partnerships that will facilitate the preferred response to behavioral health crises, including ensuring that peace officers and other first responders are equipped with a variety of options when they encounter a behavioral health crisis.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is a matter of statewide concern to incentivize and coordinate existing behavioral health crisis intervention services and to commit resources to expand the crisis response system.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1032), ch. 316, p. 1475, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1336, § 227, effective May 25; (1)(b) amended, (1)(c) added, and (2) repealed, (SB 17-207), ch. 205, p. 761, § 2, effective August 9.

27-60-102. Civil commitment statute review task force - legislative declaration - creation - duties - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1296), ch. 232, p. 1109, § 1, effective May 16.

Editor's note:

Subsection (10) provided for the repeal of this section, effective November 1, 2014. (See L. 2013, p. 1109.)

27-60-102.5. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-207), ch. 205, p. 762, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (SB 18-094), ch. 30, p. 332, § 2, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-094, see section 1 of chapter 30, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

27-60-103. Behavioral health crisis response system - services - request for proposals - criteria - reporting - rules - definition - repeal.

The BHA may issue a statewide request for proposals to entities with the capacity to create a coordinated and seamless behavioral health crisis response system to provide crisis intervention services for communities throughout the state. Separate proposals may be solicited and accepted for each of the five components listed in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The crisis response system created through this request for proposals process must be based on the following principles:

Cultural competence;

Strong community relationships;

The use of peer support;

The use of evidence-based practices;

Building on existing foundations with an eye toward innovation;

Utilization of an integrated system of care; and

Outreach to students through school-based clinics.

The components of the crisis response system must reflect a continuum of care from crisis response through stabilization and safe return to the community, with adequate support for transitions to each stage. Specific components include:

A twenty-four-hour telephone crisis service that is staffed by skilled professionals who are capable of assessing child, adolescent, and adult crisis situations and making the appropriate referrals;

Walk-in crisis services and crisis stabilization units with the capacity for immediate clinical intervention, triage, and stabilization. The walk-in crisis services and crisis stabilization units must employ an integrated health model based on evidence-based practices that consider an individual's physical and emotional health, are a part of a continuum of care, and are linked to mobile crisis services and crisis respite services.

Mobile crisis services and units that are linked to the walk-in crisis services and crisis respite services and that have the ability to initiate a response in a timely fashion to a behavioral health crisis;

Residential and respite crisis services that are linked to the walk-in crisis services and crisis respite services and that include a range of short-term crisis residential services, including but not limited to community living arrangements; and

A public information campaign.

(1.5) (a) Beginning January 1, 2023, the state department shall create in-home and residential respite care services and facilities for children and families in up to seven regions of the state, as determined by the state department and a committee of interested stakeholders.

For the 2022-23 budget year, the general assembly shall appropriate money from the behavioral and mental health cash fund pursuant to section 24-75-230 to the state department to fund in-home and residential respite care across the state as described in this subsection (1.5).

Money spent pursuant to this subsection (1.5) must conform with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as the act may be subsequently amended. The state department shall either spend or obligate such appropriation prior to December 30, 2024, and expend the appropriation on or before December 31, 2026.

This subsection (1.5)(b) is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

Beginning in state fiscal year 2023-24, money appropriated to the state department for the purpose of this subsection (1.5) must continue the statewide access to crisis system services for children and youth until June 30, 2026.

Beginning in the state fiscal year 2022-23, money appropriated to the state department for the purpose of implementing this subsection (1.5) must support residential respite care provided to youth involved in the foster care system.

Respite foster care homes must be in compliance with all other applicable rules regulating foster care homes.

The state department and any person that receives money from the state department shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

The BHA shall collaborate with the committee of interested stakeholders established in subsection (3) of this section to develop the request for proposals, including eligibility and award criteria. Priority may be given to entities that have demonstrated partnerships with Colorado-based resources. Proposals will be evaluated on, at a minimum, an applicant's ability, relative to the specific component involved, to:

Demonstrate innovation based on evidence-based practices that show evidence of collaboration with existing systems of care to build on current strengths and maximize resources;

Coordinate closely with community mental health organizations that provide services regardless of the source of payment, such as behavioral health organizations, community mental health centers, regional care collaborative organizations, substance use treatment providers, and managed service organizations;

Serve individuals regardless of their ability to pay;

Be part of a continuum of care;

Utilize peer supports;

Include key community participants;

Demonstrate a capacity to meet the demand for services;

Understand and provide services that are specialized for the unique needs of child and adolescent patients; and

Reflect an understanding of the different response mechanisms utilized between mental health and substance use disorder crises.

The BHA shall establish a committee of interested stakeholders that will be responsible for reviewing the proposals and awarding contracts pursuant to this section. Representatives from the state department of health care policy and financing must be included in the committee of interested stakeholders. A stakeholder participating in the committee must not have a financial or other conflict of interest that would prevent him or her from impartially reviewing proposals.

If additional money is appropriated, the BHA may issue additional requests for proposals consistent with this section and the state procurement code, articles 101 and 102 of title 24.

If the full appropriation by the general assembly for the implementation of this section is not dispersed as specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the committee shall accept and review proposals and award contracts as the proposals are received and not require an application be held until a subsequent request for proposals.

If necessary, the state board may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this article 60 or the services to be supplied pursuant to this article 60.

Beginning in January 2014, and every January thereafter, the BHA shall report progress on the implementation of the crisis response system, as well as information about and updates to the system, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203.

Repealed.

Repealed.

On or before January 1, 2023, in order to promote transparency and accountability, the office shall require each administrative service organization that has twenty-five percent or more ownership by providers of behavioral health services to comply with the following conflict of interest policies:

Providers who have ownership or board membership in an administrative service organization shall not have control, influence, or decision-making authority in how funding is distributed to any provider or the establishment of provider networks.

The office shall quarterly review an administrative service organization's funding allocation to ensure that all providers are being equally considered for funding. The office is authorized to review any other pertinent information to ensure the administrative service organization is meeting state and federal rules and regulations and is not inappropriately giving preference to providers with ownership or board membership.

An employee of a contracted provider of an administrative service organization shall not also be an employee of the administrative service organization unless the employee is a medical director for the administrative service organization. If the medical director is also an employee of a provider that has board membership or ownership in the administrative service organization, the administrative service organization shall develop policies, approved by the commissioner of the behavioral health administration, to mitigate any conflict of interest the medical director may have.

An administrative service organization's board shall not have more than fifty percent of contracted providers as board members, and the administrative service organization is encouraged to have a community member on the administrative service organization's board.

If the office is unable to contract with an administrative service organization that meets the requirements of this subsection (8), the office may designate another existing administrative service organization to temporarily provide the services for that region, for up to one year, pending designation of a new administrative service organization. If the office is unable to designate a new administrative service organization, the temporary administrative service organization may continue to provide the regional behavioral health crisis response system services on a year by year basis.

As used in this subsection (8), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Medical director" means a physician who oversees the medical care and other designated care and services in an administrative services organization. The medical director may be responsible for helping to develop clinical quality management and utilization management.

"Ownership" means an individual who is a legal proprietor of an organization, including a provider or individual who owns assets of an organization, or has a financial stake, interest, or governance role in the administrative services organization.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-266), ch. 231, p. 1105, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 2017:

(7) repealed, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1337, § 228, effective May 25; IP(1)(a), IP(1)(b), (4)(a), (5), and (6) amended and (7) repealed, (SB 17-207), ch. 205, p. 762, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

IP(1)(a) and (6)(b) amended, (SB 18-161), ch. 123, p. 830, § 4, effective September 1.

L. 2022:

(1.5) added, (HB 22-1283), ch. 185, p. 1243, § 3, effective May 18; (8) added, (SB 22-106), ch. 196, p. 1310, § 2, effective May 20; IP(1)(a), IP(2), (3), (4)(a), and (6)(a) amended and (6)(b) and (6)(c) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1519, § 88, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-207, see section 1 of chapter 205, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1283, see section 1 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

27-60-104. Behavioral health crisis response system - crisis service facilities - walk-in centers - mobile response units - report.

All behavioral health entities, crisis walk-in centers, acute treatment units, mobile crisis programs, respite services, and crisis stabilization units within the crisis response system, regardless of program licensure, shall meet standards for approval pursuant to section 27-66-105. Facility-based crisis service providers must be approved or designated to adequately care for an individual brought to the facility through the emergency mental health procedure described in section 27-65-105 and be an approved treatment facility pursuant to section 27-81-106. The arrangements for care must be completed through the crisis response system or prearranged partnerships with other crisis intervention services.

The BHA shall ensure that mobile response units are available to respond to a behavioral health crisis anywhere in the state within no more than two hours, either face-to-face or using telehealth operations, for mobile crisis evaluations.

Mobile crisis services may be delivered by criminal justice diversion programs approved by the BHA or a crisis response system contractor.

All walk-in centers throughout the state's crisis response system must be appropriately designated by the commissioner for an emergency mental health hold, adequately prepared, and properly staffed to accept an individual through the procedure outlined in section 27-65-106 or a voluntary application for mental health services pursuant to section 27-65-103 or 27-65-104. Priority for individuals placed under an emergency mental health hold pursuant to section 27-65-106 is on treating high-acuity individuals in the least restrictive environment without the use of law enforcement.

All crisis walk-in centers throughout the state's crisis response system shall be appropriately licensed, adequately prepared, and properly staffed to provide crisis services to an individual with a substance use disorder, as that term is defined in section 27-81-102, or an individual with a disability, as defined in the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended, regardless of primary diagnosis, co-occurring conditions, or if the individual requires assistance with activities of daily living, as defined in section 12-270-104. A crisis walk-in center shall prioritize treating high-acuity individuals in the least restrictive environment without the use of law enforcement.

The ability of crisis walk-in centers to accept individuals through an emergency mental health hold outlined in section 27-65-106, a voluntary application for substance use disorder services pursuant to section 27-81-109, or a voluntary application for mental health services pursuant to section 27-65-103 or 27-65-104 may include, but is not limited to, purchasing, installing, and using telehealth operations for mobile crisis evaluations in partnership with hospitals, clinics, law enforcement agencies, and other appropriate service providers.

(3.5) Mobile crisis programs and crisis walk-in centers shall provide crisis response screening services to any individual seeking such services, including youth of any age and an individual with a disability, as defined in the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended, regardless of primary diagnosis, co-occurring conditions, or if the individual requires assistance with activities of daily living, as defined in section 12-270-104. All additional or corresponding behavioral health services beyond the crisis response screening must be provided in accordance with all applicable state laws, including, but not limited to, sections 12-245-203.5, 13-22-102, and 27-65-103.

Rural crisis facilities are encouraged to work collaboratively with other facilities in the region that provide care twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, to form local arrangements.

The BHA shall encourage crisis response system contractors in each region to develop partnerships with the broad array of crisis intervention services through mobile response units and telehealth-capable walk-in centers in rural communities that offer care twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week.

The BHA shall ensure crisis response system contractors are responsible for community engagement, coordination, and system navigation for key partners, including criminal justice agencies, emergency departments, hospitals, primary care facilities, behavioral health entities, walk-in centers, and other crisis service facilities. The goals of community coordination are to:

Formalize relationships with partners in the contractually defined regions;

Pursue collaborative programming for behavioral health services, including, when possible, embedding crisis clinicians and consultants in first response systems;

Build close relationships between first responders and dispatch centers and the crisis response system contractor in the region; and

Coordinate behavioral health crises interventions in the community as early as possible to promote diversion from the criminal justice system and continuity of care.

The BHA shall explore solutions for addressing secure transportation, as defined in section 25-3.5-103 (11.4), of individuals placed on a seventy-two-hour treatment and evaluation hold pursuant to article 65 of this title 27, and shall include the following information as part of its 2023 "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required pursuant to section 2-7-203:

How crisis contractors are facilitating the use of secure transportation or contracting with secure transportation licensees; and

How the BHA has supported and encouraged crisis contractors to include secure transportation in the behavioral health crisis response system.

The BHA shall ensure consistent training for professionals who have regular contact with individuals experiencing a behavioral health crisis.

The BHA shall conduct an assessment of need and capacity of the statewide crisis response system to better understand the state's needs for crisis response and service gaps across the state.

The state department shall annually, in August, notify each public and private school in the state about services provided by the behavioral health crisis response system, including but not limited to how to engage with and what to expect from the services, and the possibility of peer-to-peer counseling as a part of the offered services. The state department shall provide behavioral health crisis response system awareness and educational materials to each public and private school in the state.

The state department shall collaborate with the department of education, created in section 24-1-115, in identifying public and private schools in Colorado, including but not limited to identifying school contact information.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-207), ch. 205, p. 764, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1) and IP(6) amended, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3640, § 11, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1426, § 12, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(7) amended, (HB 21-1085), ch. 355, p. 2312, § 5, effective June 27.

L. 2022:

(1) and (3)(b) amended and (3)(a.5) and (3.5) added, (HB 22-1214), ch. 142, p. 937, § 1, effective April 27; (10) added, (HB 22-1052), ch. 453, p. 3255, § 2, effective June 8; (2), (3)(a), (5), IP(6), IP(7), (7)(b), (8), and (9), amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1520, § 89, effective July 1; (3) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3239, § 55, effective August 10; (3)(a) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1601, § 251, effective August 10.

27-60-104.5. Behavioral health capacity tracking system - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly finds that:

There is a shortage of available beds for psychiatric emergencies, withdrawal management for substance use disorders, and intensive residential inpatient and outpatient behavioral health services in Colorado;

Creating a behavioral health capacity tracking system of available treatment capacity and medication-assisted treatment programs would help families, law enforcement agencies, counties, court personnel, and emergency room personnel locate an appropriate treatment option for individuals experiencing behavioral health crises; and

Further, a tracking system would decrease the time that individuals wait in emergency rooms, ensure that existing resources are maximized, and increase the likelihood that individuals in crisis receive services closer to their community.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that the creation of a behavioral health capacity tracking system is an important tool for addressing behavioral health crises, including connecting individuals to treatment for opioid and other substance use disorders.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Consistent noncompliance" means when a provider does not complete daily required capacity updates for two or more consecutive days or has five or more days of noncompliance in any given month.

"Tracking system" means the behavioral health capacity tracking system created pursuant to this section.

Pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, the BHA shall implement a behavioral health capacity tracking system, which must include the following:

A twenty-four-hour, web-based platform;

Online access by health-care professionals, law enforcement, and court personnel;

Coordination with the telephone crisis service that is part of the behavioral health crisis response system pursuant to section 27-60-103;

Required capacity updates, at least daily, unless the facility is a residential facility and capacity has not changed, with a penalty for consistent noncompliance, for facilities listed under subsection (3)(e) of this section; except that opioid treatment programs licensed pursuant to section 27-80-204 are only required to update daily whether the program is accepting new clients; and

Capacity reporting for the following facilities and treatment providers statewide:

Facilities that provide evaluation and treatment to individuals held under an emergency commitment pursuant to section 27-81-111, an involuntary commitment pursuant to section 27-81-112, or a civil commitment pursuant to section 27-65-106, including crisis stabilization units, acute treatment units, community mental health centers, and hospitals, including state mental health institutes;

Inpatient treatment facilities;

Residential treatment facilities;

Withdrawal management facilities; and

Facilities licensed pursuant to section 27-80-204, including opioid treatment programs and medically managed and clinically managed withdrawal management facilities.

In addition to reporting by those facilities listed in subsection (3)(e) of this section, the tracking system may allow any medical provider providing behavioral health treatment as part of the provider's medical practice to participate in the tracking system with prior approval by the BHA.

To the extent possible, the tracking system should be designed to collect the following information:

The name, address, web address, and telephone number of the facility or treatment program and information as to the process for confirming the current availability of a bed or a slot in a treatment program and for reserving a bed or slot in the facility or treatment program;

The license type for the facility or treatment program and the licensed bed capacity of the facility;

The number of beds or slots currently available and staffed for behavioral health services;

Admission and exclusion criteria, including gender, age, acuity level, medical complications, diagnoses, or behaviors excluded, such as intellectual or developmental disabilities, aggression, substance use disorders, traumatic brain injury, or history of violence or aggressive behavior;

The type of substance for which the facility or treatment program provides treatment;

Whether the facility serves involuntary clients;

Payer sources accepted by each facility or treatment program;

The time and date of the last update of information for the facility or treatment program; and

A link to a stable location map.

The tracking system is designed to provide immediate and accurate information regarding the availability of facility beds or slots in treatment programs but does not guarantee availability. The user shall be directed to contact the facility or treatment program directly to confirm capacity and to arrange placement.

Repealed.

Subject to available appropriations, the BHA shall implement a centralized, web-based tracking system as described in this section and shall ensure that appropriate tracking system information is available to the public. The contractor of the twenty-four-hour telephone crisis services provided pursuant to section 27-60-103 shall use the tracking system as an available service resource locator.

Repealed.

The state board may adopt rules, as necessary, to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1287), ch. 175, p. 2012, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2020:

(8) amended and (9) repealed, (HB 20-1391), ch. 211, p. 1026, § 1, effective June 30; (3)(e)(I) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1416, § 52, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

IP(3), (4), (8), and (10) amended and (7) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1522, § 90, effective July 1; (3)(e)(I) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3235, § 41, effective August 10.

27-60-105. Outpatient restoration to competency services - jail-based behavioral health services - responsible entity - duties - report - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Colorado's statutory scheme does not designate an entity responsible for competency restoration services, nor does it provide a sufficient framework for the provision of outpatient restoration services to adults or juveniles. As a result, there have been deficits and inconsistencies in the administration of the educational component of outpatient competency restoration services and the coordination and integration of that component with existing services and supports to address the underlying causes of incompetency.

The lack of a designated responsible entity for competency restoration services in Colorado has caused inconsistency in competency restoration services throughout the state and delays in proceedings that impact the due process rights of juveniles and adults involved in the juvenile and criminal justice systems, as well as the interests of victims;

Competency restoration services must be localized and accessible and take into account the public safety, while still allowing for state-level standards and oversight;

Competency restoration services for juveniles must be provided in the least restrictive environment, while taking into account the public safety and the best interests of the juvenile; and

Many services essential to the restoration of competency can be provided through existing programs using existing funding. However, the current system lacks funding and responsibility for the educational component of competency restoration services and case management to access and leverage available services and supports which, combined, will help ensure an integrated approach to competency restoration for juveniles and adults.

The state department serves as a central organizing structure and responsible entity for the provision of competency restoration education services, coordination of competency restoration services ordered by the court pursuant to section 16-8.5-111 (2)(b) or 19-2.5-704 (2), and jail-based behavioral health services pursuant to section 27-60-106.

The state department shall develop standardized juvenile and adult curricula for the educational component of competency restoration services. The curricula must have a content and delivery mechanism that allows the curricula to be tailored to meet individual needs, including those of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Beginning July 1, 2019, the state department has the following duties and responsibilities, subject to available appropriations:

To oversee providers of the education component of competency restoration services, including:

Establishing and enforcing qualifications of competency restoration educators, including minimum and ongoing training requirements;

Evaluating models for the delivery of competency restoration education in a manner that maximizes and expands on available resources while minimizing costs to the state; and

Maintaining an adequate pool of competency restoration providers, as defined by:

Qualifications and training;

Geographical accessibility, in light of the goal of ensuring community-based restoration in the least restrictive environment throughout the state; and

Ability to provide culturally competent and developmentally appropriate competency restoration education tailored to an individual's unique needs;

To develop models for providing competency restoration services that integrate competency restoration education with other case management and treatment, ensure continuation of ongoing treatment and services as appropriate, avoid duplication of services, and achieve efficiencies by coordinating with existing community resources and programs;

To preserve the integrity of the competency evaluation process by ensuring that competency restoration educators operate independently from competency evaluators at the case level;

To engage with key stakeholders in the juvenile and adult justice systems to develop best practices in the delivery of competency restoration services;

To make recommendations for legislation; and

To oversee the functions of the jail-based behavioral health services program created in section 27-60-106.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before January 1, 2019, and every January 1 thereafter, the state department shall submit an annual written report to the general assembly summarizing the state department's provision of competency restoration education, its efforts toward the coordination of competency restoration education with other existing services, and the results of the jail-based behavioral health services program created in section 27-60-106. The report must include:

Data on the number of individuals ordered to competency restoration services, the average time frame for beginning and ending such services, the types of settings in which competency restoration services are provided, and the outcomes of such services;

A description of the state department's engagement with community partners to coordinate competency restoration services in an effective and efficient manner;

Identification of best and promising practices for education and coordination of competency restoration services;

A description of opportunities to maximize and increase available resources and funding;

A description of gaps in and conflicts with existing funding, services, and programming essential to the effective restoration of competency for juveniles and adults; and

A description of the services funded through the jail-based behavioral health services program created in section 27-60-106.

In addition to subsection (4) of this section and subject to available appropriations, the state department shall require any county jail to assist in the provision of interim mental health services for individuals who have been court-ordered for inpatient competency restoration and who are waiting admission for an inpatient bed. This section does not toll or otherwise modify the time frames for the state department to offer inpatient admission pursuant to the provisions of section 16-8.5-111.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-012), ch. 404, p. 2109, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(2), IP(4), (4)(d), (4)(e), IP(5), (5)(d), and (5)(e) amended and (4)(f) and (5)(f) added, (SB 18-250), ch. 403, p. 2376, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2019:

(2) and IP(4) amended and (6) added, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, pp. 2293, 2290, §§ 20, 12, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 749, § 131, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(2), (3), IP(4), IP(5), (5)(b), and (6) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1522, § 91, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) was numbered as (5) in SB 19-223 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.